Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.17, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Offenders not eligible. The following offenders are not eligible to be placed in the challenge incarceration program: (1) offenders who are committed to the commissioner's custody following a conviction for murder, manslaughter, criminal sexual conduct, assault, kidnapping, robbery, carjacking, arson, or any other offense involving death or intentional personal injury; (2) offenders who were convicted within the preceding ten years of an offense described in clause (1) and were committed to the custody of the commissioner; new text begin (3) offenders who are committed to the commissioner's custody following a conviction for a violation of section 152.021, subdivision 1; new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4) new text end offenders who have been convicted or adjudicated delinquent within the past five years for a violation of section 609.485; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end offenders who are committed to the commissioner's custody for an offense that requires registration under section 243.166; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end offenders who are the subject of a current arrest warrant or detainer; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end offenders who have fewer than 180 days remaining until their supervised release date; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end offenders who have had disciplinary confinement time added to their sentence or who have been placed in segregation, unless 90 days have elapsed from the imposition of the additional disciplinary confinement time or the last day of segregation; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end offenders who have received a suspended formal disciplinary sanction, unless the suspension has expired; and deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end offenders whose governing sentence is for an offense from another state or the United States. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end